Maryland, session 2026, HB0402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–207.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(I) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN §
5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE;
(II) A CONDOMINIUM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE; OR
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS DEFINED IN § 11B–101 OF
THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 402 3
(3) “GOVERNING BODY” MEANS:
(I) THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OF A CONDOMINIUM;
(II) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION;
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, OR
ANY OTHER ENTITY ESTABLISHED TO GOVERN A PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN
INSTRUMENT THAT IMPOSES ON LOTS, OR ON THE OWNERS OR OCCUPANTS OF LOTS,
ANY MANDATORY FEE IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SERVICES OR
OTHERWISE FOR THE BENEFIT OF SOME OR ALL OF THE LOTS; OR
(IV) ANY OTHER BODY AUTHORIZED TO ADOPT RULES OR
REGULATIONS GOVERNING A CONDOMINIUM, COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION, OR HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(4) “LOCAL COMMISSION” MEANS A COMMISSION ON COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
11C–101 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(5) “MEMBER” MEANS:
(I) AN OCCUPANT OR A UNIT OWNER UNDER THE MARYLAND
CONDOMINIUM ACT;
(II) A LOT OWNER UNDER THE MARYLAND HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION ACT; OR
(III) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS
DEFINED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(6) “UNIT” MEANS THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
OMBUDSMAN UNIT IN THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) THERE IS A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN UNIT IN
THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE UNIT IS:
(1) TO MONITOR CHANGES IN FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS RELATING
TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;

HOUSE BILL 402
(2) TO PUBLISH INFORMATION CONCERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES ON THE WEBSITE OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(3) TO ASSIST MEMBERS IN UNDERSTANDING RIGHTS AND
PROCESSES AVAILABLE TO MEMBERS UNDER LAWS AND REGULATIONS GOVERNING
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES; AND
(4) ON REQUEST, TO PROVIDE REFERRALS TO PUBLIC AND PRIVATE
ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION SERVICES, WITH A GOAL OF REDUCING AND
RESOLVING CONFLICTS AMONG GOVERNING BODIES AND MEMBERS.
(D) THE UNIT SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A FULL–TIME COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN;
AND
(2) STAFF AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(E) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL APPOINT THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN.
(2) THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN MUST BE A
MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND BAR.
(F) THE UNIT SHALL RECEIVE AND RESPOND TO COMPLAINTS BY MEMBERS
REGARDING FINAL ADVERSE DECISIONS BY A GOVERNING BODY OR COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(G) IN RESPONSE TO A COMPLAINT, OR ON THE INITIATIVE OF THE
OMBUDSMAN, THE UNIT SHALL:
(1) REFER THE COMPLAINT TO AN APPROPRIATE LOCAL COMMISSION
FOR FURTHER REVIEW OF WHETHER THE FINAL ADVERSE DECISION CONFLICTS
WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN
THE JURISDICTION; OR
(2) MAKE A DETERMINATION OF WHETHER THE FINAL ADVERSE
DECISION CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES AND PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE COMPLAINANT OF THE
DETERMINATION.

HOUSE BILL 402 5
(H) (1) IF THE UNIT DETERMINES THAT A FINAL ADVERSE DECISION
CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES, THE UNIT SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE MEMBER, THE GOVERNING
BOARD, AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER
THAT THE ADVERSE DECISION CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS
GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
(2) IF WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER ISSUING A DETERMINATION THE
OMBUDSMAN RECEIVES A SUBSEQUENT COMPLAINT OF A FINAL ADVERSE DECISION
FOR THE SAME VIOLATION, THE UNIT SHALL REFER THE MATTER TO THE
APPROPRIATE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(I) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE UNIT SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
UNIT DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF COMPLAINTS RECEIVED BY THE UNIT;
(II) THE TYPES OF ASSISTANCE REQUESTED;
(III) ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE UNIT;
(IV) THE NUMBER OF REFERRALS MADE TO LOCAL
COMMISSIONS; AND
(V) DATA ON DISPOSITIONS AND OUTCOMES OF COMPLAINTS
RECEIVED.
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–304.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 2–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 402
(3) “GOVERNING DOCUMENTS” MEANS AN OFFERING STATEMENT, A
DECLARATION, BYLAWS, RULES, REGULATIONS, A PROPRIETARY LEASE, OR ANY
OTHER SIMILAR DOCUMENT OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(B) (1) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY LOCATED IN THE STATE
SHALL FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT A COPY OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, AND
ANY AMENDMENTS TO THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(2) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY THAT FAILS TO MAKE A
FILING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO A
FINE OF $500.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A DATABASE
OF GOVERNING DOCUMENTS FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE DESCRIBED IN § 2–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE THE FOLLOWING FEES FOR
FILINGS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR AN INITIAL FILING, UP TO $100; AND
(II) FOR ANY AMENDMENT TO A GOVERNING DOCUMENT, UP TO
$25.
Article – Real Property
TITLE 11C. LOCAL COMMISSIONS ON COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
SUBTITLE 1. LOCAL COMMISSIONS ON COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
11C–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMON ELEMENT” MEANS:
(1) ANY PORTION OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OTHER
THAN THE UNITS OF A CONDOMINIUM OR COOPERATIVE; AND

HOUSE BILL 402 7
(2) PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED OR LEASED BY A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION.
(C) (1) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(I) A CONDOMINIUM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE
THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES;
(II) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN §
5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE; AND
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS DEFINED IN § 11B–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
TIME–SHARE PROJECT AS DEFINED IN § 11A–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) (1) “DISPUTE” MEANS A DISAGREEMENT BETWEEN AT LEAST TWO
PARTIES THAT INVOLVES:
(I) THE AUTHORITY OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY TO:
1. REQUIRE OR PROHIBIT ANY ACTION INVOLVING A
UNIT OR COMMON ELEMENT;
2. REQUIRE ANY PERSON TO PAY A FEE, A FINE, OR AN
ASSESSMENT;
3. SPEND COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY FUNDS; OR
4. ALTER OR ADD TO A COMMON ELEMENT; OR
(II) THE FAILURE OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY TO:
1. PROPERLY CONDUCT AN ELECTION;
2. GIVE ADEQUATE NOTICE OF A MEETING OR ANY
OTHER ACTION;
3. PROPERLY CONDUCT A MEETING;

HOUSE BILL 402
4. PROPERLY ADOPT A BUDGET OR RULES;
5. MAINTAIN OR AUDIT BOOKS AND RECORDS;
6. ALLOW INSPECTION OF BOOKS AND RECORDS;
7. MAINTAIN OR REPAIR A COMMON ELEMENT IF THE
FAILURE RESULTS IN SIGNIFICANT PERSONAL INJURY OR PROPERTY DAMAGE; OR
8. EXERCISE ITS JUDGMENT IN GOOD FAITH
CONCERNING THE ENFORCEMENT OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS AGAINST ANY
PERSON THAT IS SUBJECT TO THOSE DOCUMENTS.
(2) “DISPUTE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DISAGREEMENT THAT
INVOLVES:
(I) TITLE TO ANY UNIT OR COMMON ELEMENT;
(II) THE PERCENTAGE INTEREST OR VOTE ALLOCABLE TO A
UNIT;
(III) THE INTERPRETATION OR ENFORCEMENT OF ANY
WARRANTY;
(IV) THE COLLECTION OF AN ASSESSMENT VALIDLY LEVIED
AGAINST A PARTY; OR
(V) THE EXERCISE OF THE JUDGMENT OR DISCRETION OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY REGARDING ANY LEGALLY AUTHORIZED ACTION.
(E) “GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(1) THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OF A CONDOMINIUM;
(2) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION;
(3) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, OR ANY
OTHER ENTITY ESTABLISHED TO GOVERN A PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN INSTRUMENT
THAT IMPOSES ON LOTS, OR ON THE OWNERS OR OCCUPANTS OF LOTS, ANY
MANDATORY FEE IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SERVICES OR
OTHERWISE FOR THE BENEFIT OF SOME OR ALL OF THE LOTS; OR

HOUSE BILL 402 9
(4) ANY OTHER BODY AUTHORIZED TO ADOPT RULES OR
REGULATIONS GOVERNING A CONDOMINIUM, COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION, OR HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(F) (1) “GOVERNING DOCUMENT” MEANS:
(I) THE MASTER DEED, DECLARATION, INCORPORATION
DOCUMENT, BYLAWS, OR RULES OF ANY COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(II) A WRITTEN PRIVATE AGREEMENT BETWEEN PARTIES
CONCERNING THE OPERATION OF THE COMMUNITY OR MAINTENANCE OR CONTROL
OF COMMON OR LIMITED COMMON PROPERTY; OR
(III) A DOCUMENT CONCERNING THE OPERATION OR
GOVERNANCE OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(2) “GOVERNING DOCUMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A LEASE UNLESS
THE LEASE PROVIDES THAT IT MAY BE ENFORCED UNDER THIS TITLE SUBTITLE.
(G) “LOCAL COMMISSION” MEANS A COMMISSION ON COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE
SUBTITLE.
(H) “LOCAL GOVERNMENT” MEANS:
(1) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OR COUNTY COUNCIL OF A
COUNTY;
(2) IF THE CHARTER OF THE COUNTY PROVIDES FOR A COUNTY
EXECUTIVE, THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND THE COUNTY COUNCIL; OR
(3) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY.
(I) “OWNER” MEANS:
(1) A UNIT OWNER IN A CONDOMINIUM;
(2) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION; OR
(3) A LOT OWNER IN A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
11C–102.

HOUSE BILL 402
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE SUPERSEDE ANY INCONSISTENT
PROVISIONS OF LOCAL LAW THAT CONFLICT WITH THIS TITLE SUBTITLE TO THE
EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
11C–103.
(A) A LOCAL COMMISSION ON COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES
ESTABLISHED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OF A COUNTY BY LOCAL LAW SHALL
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE MEMBERS WHO:
1. ARE OWNERS IN A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
AND
2. REPRESENT PROFESSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS INVOLVED IN
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT OR REAL ESTATE SALES, DEVELOPERS, OR ATTORNEYS
WHO REPRESENT COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES INCLUDING AT LEAST ONE
MEMBER WHO IS A LICENSED COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(II) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL DETERMINE THE TOTAL
NUMBER OF MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS SHALL SERVE AS NONVOTING
MEMBERS OF A LOCAL COMMISSION:
(I) A DESIGNEE OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT; AND
(II) A DESIGNEE OF A COUNTY AGENCY DEALING WITH:
1. PLANNING;
2. ENVIRONMENT;
3. PERMITTING;
4. TRANSPORTATION; OR
5. HOUSING AND COMMUNITY AFFAIRS.

HOUSE BILL 402 11
(C) THE CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR OF A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL BE
ELECTED FROM AMONG THE VOTING MEMBERSHIP OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ESTABLISHING A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES
FOR THE APPOINTMENT AND TERMS OF MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) A MEMBER OF A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN
TWO CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
11C–104.
(A) A MAJORITY OF THE TOTAL MEMBERSHIP OF A LOCAL COMMISSION
SHALL CONSTITUTE A QUORUM.
(B) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST MONTHLY AND
DETERMINE THE TIMES AND PLACES OF ITS MEETINGS.
(C) A MEMBER OF A LOCAL COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD COUNTY TRAVEL REGULATIONS.
(D) (1) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) ADOPT RULES OF PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT AS
APPROPRIATE FOR MEMBERS AND STAFF;
(II) KEEP A RECORD OF ITS PROCEEDINGS;
(III) EXAMINE THE NEEDS OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY;
(IV) ADVISE COUNTY GOVERNMENT AND APPROPRIATE STATE
AND FEDERAL AGENCIES ON MATTERS RELATING TO COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES; AND
(V) PROVIDE TRAINING ON THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF A LOCAL
COMMISSION’S MEMBERS TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY BY:

HOUSE BILL 402
1. DEVELOPING AN EDUCATIONAL CURRICULUM FOR
NEW MEMBERS; AND
2. APPROVING AN ALTERNATIVE EDUCATIONAL
CURRICULUM FOR NEW MEMBERS.
(2) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY:
(I) EMPLOY STAFF AS AUTHORIZED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(II) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR RESOLVING DISCIPLINARY
MATTERS PENDING BEFORE THE LOCAL COMMISSION THROUGH NONJUDICIAL
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESSES;
(III) DEVELOP EDUCATIONAL AND TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES
FOR GOVERNING BODIES;
(IV) ADOPT ADDITIONAL BYLAWS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE BUSINESS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION; AND
(V) ADOPT ANY ADDITIONAL REGULATIONS, PROCEDURES, OR
STANDARDS CONSISTENT WITH THE MISSION OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION AND TO
CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE.
11C–105.
(A) A LOCAL LAW ESTABLISHING A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY TO REGISTER WITH THE LOCAL
COMMISSION ANNUALLY ON A FORM THAT IDENTIFIES:
(1) THE ELECTED LEADERSHIP OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY; AND
(2) THE MANAGING AGENTS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(B) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY THAT FAILS TO REGISTER OR
MAKES A FALSE STATEMENT ON A REGISTRATION FORM IS INELIGIBLE TO FILE A
DISPUTE.
11C–106.

HOUSE BILL 402 13
(A) A LOCAL LAW ESTABLISHING A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE
THE COLLECTION OF A REASONABLE FEE FOR SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL
COMMISSION.
(B) ANY AUTHORIZED FEE SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE COST OF
MAINTAINING THE LOCAL COMMISSION AND MAY INCLUDE:
(1) A PER UNIT ANNUAL CHARGE TO COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES TO RENEW REGISTRATION;
(2) FEES FOR DISPUTE RESOLUTION UNDER § 11C–110 OF THIS TITLE
SUBTITLE, SERVICE, AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE; AND
(3) A PER UNIT CHARGE TO DEVELOPERS FOR THE RECORDATION OF
DOCUMENTS.
(C) IF THE COLLECTION OF A FEE BY A LOCAL COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PUBLISH THE FEE
SCHEDULE.
11C–107.
A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT ESTABLISHES A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL
DESIGNATE A COUNTY AGENCY OR AN OFFICE TO:
(1) DISSEMINATE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS REGARDING PROGRAMS
THAT ASSIST COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(2) CONDUCT EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS TO PROMOTE THE
OPERATION OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(3) MAINTAIN A LIST OF:
(I) COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY,
INCLUDING THE LEADERSHIP OF EACH COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(II) PROFESSIONAL MANAGEMENT COMPANIES THAT PROVIDE
SERVICES TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY;
(4) MAINTAIN INFORMATION AND A REFERRAL SYSTEM FOR ALL
COUNTY SERVICES RELATED TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(5) MAINTAIN A COLLECTION OF GOVERNING DOCUMENTS;

HOUSE BILL 402
(6) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO GOVERNING BODIES ON
MATTERS INCLUDING:
(I) LEADERSHIP TRANSITION;
(II) ELECTIONS;
(III) ADOPTION OF RULES;
(IV) ENFORCEMENT OF RULES;
(V) SELECTION OF ASSOCIATION MANAGERS; AND
(VI) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT;
(7) MAINTAIN AN OPERATIONS MANUAL TO GUIDE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY LEADERSHIP;
(8) ADVISE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES AND PROFESSIONAL
ASSOCIATION MANAGERS OF CHANGES IN THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS THAT
AFFECT THEIR COMMUNITIES OR OPERATIONS; AND
(9) OPERATE A DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS TO FURNISH
MEDIATION AND ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
11C–108.
(A) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY HEAR ANY DISPUTE BETWEEN PARTIES.
(B) A PARTY MAY NOT FILE A DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL COMMISSION UNTIL:
(1) THE PARTY HAS MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO EXHAUST ALL
PROCEDURES AND REMEDIES PROVIDED BY THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(2) AT LEAST 60 DAYS AFTER ANY PROCEDURE OR REMEDY HAS BEEN
INITIATED WITH THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(C) (1) IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
DETERMINES THAT A DISPUTE EXISTS, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL NOTIFY THE OTHER PARTIES OF THE OPTION TO
FILE THE DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 402 15
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
MAY NOT TAKE ACTION TO ENFORCE OR IMPLEMENT THE DECISION OF THE
GOVERNING BODY FOR 14 DAYS FOLLOWING NOTIFICATION OF ALL OTHER PARTIES.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 11C–109 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE, ON THE
FILING OF A DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL COMMISSION, THE DECISION OF THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL BE STAYED AND
MAY NOT BE ENFORCED OR IMPLEMENTED, OTHER THAN BY FILING A CIVIL ACTION,
UNTIL THE COMPLETION OF THE DISPUTE PROCESS.
11C–109.
(A) (1) AT ANY TIME AFTER A DISPUTE IS FILED, THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO LIFT AN
AUTOMATIC STAY UNDER § 11C–108 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE.
(2) IF A HEARING PANEL HAS NOT BEEN APPOINTED UNDER §
11C–112 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL AUTHORIZE A
SPECIAL STANDING PANEL TO CONSIDER REQUESTS FOR RELIEF FROM STAYS.
(3) THE SPECIAL PANEL SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THREE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION
DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR; AND
(II) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED UNDER §
11C–103(B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE AND AT LEAST ONE MEMBER
DESCRIBED UNDER § 11C–103(B)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
THAT REQUESTS RELIEF FROM A STAY SHALL SERVE A COPY OF ITS REQUEST ON ANY
PARTY NAMED IN THE DISPUTE BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR PERSONAL SERVICE.
(2) A CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE SHALL ACCOMPANY ANY REQUEST
SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) A PARTY SERVED WITH A COPY OF THE REQUEST SHALL FILE ANY
OPPOSITION TO THE REQUEST WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING SERVICE.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A REQUEST
FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY MAY BE GRANTED ONLY IF THE ASSIGNED PANEL FINDS
THAT:

HOUSE BILL 402
(1) ENFORCING THE STAY WOULD RESULT IN UNDUE HARM TO THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(2) LIFTING THE STAY WILL NOT RESULT IN UNDUE HARM TO THE
RIGHTS OR INTERESTS OF ANY OPPOSING PARTY.
(D) IF A REQUEST FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY STATING FACTS SUFFICIENT TO
SHOW A NEED FOR IMMEDIATE ACTION IS NOT GRANTED OR DENIED WITHIN 20 DAYS
AFTER THE REQUEST WAS FILED, THE REQUEST SHALL BE DEEMED GRANTED.
11C–110.
(A) (1) FOLLOWING THE FILING OF A DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL
COMMISSION, AN AGENCY DESIGNATED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNDER §
11C–107 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE MAY INVESTIGATE FACTS AND ASSEMBLE
DOCUMENTS RELEVANT TO THE DISPUTE AND MAY PREPARE A SUMMARY OF THE
ISSUES IN THE DISPUTE FOR USE BY THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE MAY NOTIFY A PARTY IF
THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE FINDS THAT A DISPUTE WAS NOT PROPERLY
FILED.
(3) THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE MAY NOTIFY EACH PARTY
OF THE DISPUTE REGARDING POSSIBLE SANCTIONS UNDER § 11C–112 OF THIS
TITLE SUBTITLE.
(B) IF THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE FINDS THAT, ASSUMING ALL
FACTS ALLEGED BY THE PARTY THAT FILED THE DISPUTE ARE TRUE, THERE ARE NO
REASONABLE GROUNDS TO CONCLUDE THAT A VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW OR
ANY GOVERNING DOCUMENT HAS OCCURRED, THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE
SHALL INFORM THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF THE RESULTS OF AN INVESTIGATION BY A DESIGNATED
AGENCY OR OFFICE, A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY:
(1) IF IT FINDS THAT THERE ARE NO REASONABLE GROUNDS TO
CONCLUDE THAT A VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW OR ANY GOVERNING DOCUMENT
HAS OCCURRED, DISMISS THE DISPUTE;
(2) REQUEST ADDITIONAL INVESTIGATION BY THE DESIGNATED
AGENCY OR OFFICE; OR

HOUSE BILL 402 17
(3) SCHEDULE A HEARING ON THE DISPUTE.
(D) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY RECONSIDER THE DISMISSAL OF A DISPUTE
IF ANY PARTY FILES A MOTION TO RECONSIDER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
DISPUTE IS DISMISSED, DEMONSTRATING THAT:
(1) THE LOCAL COMMISSION ERRONEOUSLY INTERPRETED OR
APPLIED APPLICABLE LAW OR A GOVERNING DOCUMENT; OR
(2) MATERIAL ISSUES OF FACT THAT ARE NECESSARY TO A FAIR
RESOLUTION OF THE DISPUTE REMAIN UNRESOLVED.
11C–111.
(A) (1) ANY PARTY IN A DISPUTE MAY REQUEST MEDIATION.
(2) IF A PARTY REQUESTS MEDIATION, THE LOCAL COMMISSION
SHALL NOTIFY ALL PARTIES OF THE REQUEST AND OF THE MEDIATION SESSION.
(3) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A QUALIFIED MEDIATOR
TO MEET WITH THE PARTIES WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A PARTY REQUESTS MEDIATION
TO ATTEMPT TO SETTLE THE DISPUTE.
(B) IF A PARTY REFUSES TO ATTEND A MEDIATION SESSION, OR IF
MEDIATION DOES NOT SUCCESSFULLY RESOLVE THE DISPUTE WITHIN 10 DAYS
AFTER THE FIRST MEDIATION SESSION IS HELD, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL
PROMPTLY SCHEDULE A HEARING.
11C–112.
(A) (1) IF A HEARING IS SCHEDULED, THE CHAIR OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE A PANEL TO HEAR THE DISPUTE.
(2) THE CHAIR SHALL SELECT AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED
UNDER § 11C–103(B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE AND AT LEAST ONE MEMBER
DESCRIBED UNDER § 11C–103(B)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE.
(3) THE LOCAL COMMISSION MEMBERS SELECTED BY THE CHAIR
SHALL DESIGNATE A THIRD MEMBER OF THE PANEL FROM A LIST OF VOLUNTEER
ARBITRATORS TRAINED OR EXPERIENCED IN COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
ISSUES MAINTAINED BY THE LOCAL COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 402
(4) IF A SUITABLE ARBITRATOR IS NOT AVAILABLE, THE CHAIR OF
THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL DESIGNATE:
(I) A THIRD PANELIST FROM AMONG THE VOTING MEMBERS OF
THE LOCAL COMMISSION; AND
(II) THE CHAIR OF THE PANEL.
(B) A PANELIST MAY NOT HAVE AN INTEREST IN THE DISPUTE TO BE HEARD.
(C) A HEARING PANEL SHALL HOLD A HEARING ON EACH DISPUTE THAT IS
NOT RESOLVED THROUGH MEDIATION UNDER § 11C–111 OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE
UNLESS THE LOCAL COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE DISPUTE IS:
(1) IDENTICAL TO ANOTHER DISPUTE BETWEEN THE SAME PARTIES
ON WHICH A HEARING HAS ALREADY BEEN HELD UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(2) CLEARLY NOT WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION.
(D) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF A HEARING TO ALL
PARTIES NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS BEFORE A HEARING, UNLESS THE LOCAL
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT AN EXPEDITED HEARING IS NECESSARY, IN WHICH
CASE NOTICE SHALL BE PROVIDED TO ALL PARTIES AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE A
HEARING.
(E) A PARTY OR WITNESS MAY BE ADVISED BY COUNSEL AT A HEARING.
(F) IF A PARTY, AFTER PROPER NOTICE, DOES NOT APPEAR AT THE
SCHEDULED HEARING, THE HEARING PANEL MAY ORDER ANY RELIEF FOR ANOTHER
PARTY THAT THE FACTS ON RECORD WARRANT.
(G) (1) THE HEARING PANEL SHALL APPLY STATE AND COUNTY LAWS
AND ALL RELEVANT CASE LAW TO THE FACTS OF THE DISPUTE.
(2) A DECISION OF THE HEARING PANEL IS BINDING ON THE PARTIES.
(H) (1) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY ENFORCE A DECISION OF THE
HEARING PANEL BY APPROPRIATE LEGAL ACTION.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ENFORCEMENT ACTION, A LOCAL
COMMISSION MAY:

HOUSE BILL 402 19
(I) FILE FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO ENFORCE OR CORRECT
ANY VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE; AND
(II) FILE TO RECOVER DAMAGES FOR A LOSS SUSTAINED AS A
RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE SUBTITLE.
(I) A HEARING PANEL MAY AWARD COSTS, INCLUDING REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES, TO ANY PARTY IF ANY OTHER PARTY:
(1) FILED OR MAINTAINED A FRIVOLOUS DISPUTE, OR FILED OR
MAINTAINED A DISPUTE IN BAD FAITH;
(2) REFUSED TO PARTICIPATE IN MEDIATION OF A DISPUTE; OR
(3) SUBSTANTIALLY DELAYED OR HINDERED THE DISPUTE
RESOLUTION PROCESS WITHOUT GOOD CAUSE.
(J) A HEARING PANEL MAY REQUIRE A LOSING PARTY IN A DISPUTE TO PAY
ALL OR PART OF ANY FILING FEE.
(K) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY:
(1) ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL HEARING PROCEDURES; AND
(2) ADOPT ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO WITNESSES
AND EVIDENCE FOR A HEARING.
11C–113.
(A) A PARTY MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF A HEARING PANEL TO A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION THE APPROPRIATE CIRCUIT COURT.
(B) AN APPEAL OF A DECISION SHALL MAY BE CONSOLIDATED WITH ANY
CASE THAT ARISES OUT OF THE SAME FACTS.
(C) THE COURT HEARING AN APPEAL SHALL SUSTAIN THE DECISION OF THE
HEARING PANEL UNLESS THE DECISION IS:
(1) INCONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE LAW;
(2) LACKING SUBSTANTIAL EVIDENCE; OR
(3) ARBITRARY AND CAPRICIOUS.

HOUSE BILL 402
11C–114.
(A) A PARTY MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION ARISING OUT OF A GOVERNING
DOCUMENT OR A LAW REGULATING THE POWERS OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(B) IF THE COURT IS NOTIFIED THAT A DISPUTE HAS BEEN FILED WITH A
LOCAL COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE SUBTITLE, THE COURT MAY
POSTPONE A PROCEEDING FOR AT LEAST 90 DAYS.
(C) THE COURT MAY HEAR THE ACTION DE NOVO IF A HEARING PANEL
ASSIGNED TO THE DISPUTE HAS NOT ISSUED A DECISION UNDER § 11C–112 OF THIS
TITLE SUBTITLE.
SUBTITLE 2. COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OVERSIGHT DIVISION.
11C–201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11C–101 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(D) “DIVISION” MEANS THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
OVERSIGHT DIVISION IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) “GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 11C–101 OF THIS TITLE.
(F) “GOVERNING DOCUMENT” MEANS AN OFFERING STATEMENT, A
DECLARATION, BYLAWS, RULES, REGULATIONS, A PROPRIETARY LEASE, OR ANY
OTHER SIMILAR DOCUMENT OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(G) “LOCAL COMMISSION” MEANS A COMMISSION ON COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11C–103 OF
THIS TITLE.
(H) “MEMBER” MEANS:

HOUSE BILL 402 21
(1) AN OCCUPANT OR A UNIT OWNER UNDER THE MARYLAND
CONDOMINIUM ACT;
(2) A LOT OWNER UNDER THE MARYLAND HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION ACT; OR
(3) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS
DEFINED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
11C–202.
(A) THERE IS A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OVERSIGHT DIVISION
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DIVISION SHALL HAVE STAFF AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(C) THE DIVISION SHALL:
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11C–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) RECEIVE AND INVESTIGATE COMPLAINTS BY MEMBERS
REGARDING FINAL ADVERSE DECISIONS BY A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OR COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER; AND
(II) CONDUCT HEARINGS ON AND ISSUE BINDING DECISIONS
REGARDING COMPLAINTS DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM;
(2) IMPOSE FINES AND FEES AS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) MAINTAIN A REGISTRY OF GOVERNING DOCUMENTS; AND
(4) PROVIDE COMPLIANCE GUIDANCE AND EDUCATIONAL
MATERIALS.
(D) IN RESPONSE TO A COMPLAINT, THE DIVISION SHALL:
(1) REFER THE COMPLAINT TO AN APPROPRIATE LOCAL COMMISSION
FOR FURTHER REVIEW OF WHETHER THE FINAL ADVERSE DECISION CONFLICTS
WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN
THE JURISDICTION; OR
(2) IF THE COUNTY DOES NOT HAVE A LOCAL COMMISSION, RESOLVE
THE COMPLAINT USING THE PROCEDURES DESCRIBED IN § 11C–204 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 402
(E) (1) IF THE DIVISION DETERMINES THAT A FINAL ADVERSE DECISION
CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES, THE DIVISION SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE MEMBER, THE
GOVERNING BOARD, AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
MANAGER THAT THE ADVERSE DECISION CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS
GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
(2) IF WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER ISSUING A DETERMINATION THE
DIVISION RECEIVES A SUBSEQUENT COMPLAINT OF A FINAL ADVERSE DECISION
FOR THE SAME VIOLATION, THE DIVISION SHALL REFER THE MATTER TO THE
APPROPRIATE LOCAL COMMISSION, IF ANY.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DIVISION SHALL REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE
ACTIVITIES OF THE DIVISION DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF COMPLAINTS RECEIVED BY THE DIVISION;
(II) THE TYPES OF ASSISTANCE REQUESTED;
(III) ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE DIVISION;
(IV) THE NUMBER OF REFERRALS MADE TO LOCAL
COMMISSIONS; AND
(V) DATA ON DISPOSITIONS AND OUTCOMES OF COMPLAINTS
RECEIVED.
11C–203.
(A) (1) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY LOCATED IN THE STATE
SHALL FILE WITH THE DIVISION A COPY OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, AND ANY
AMENDMENTS TO THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A DATABASE OF
GOVERNING DOCUMENTS FILED WITH THE DIVISION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.

HOUSE BILL 402 23
(B) UNLESS THE COUNTY HAS A LOCAL COMMISSION, A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IN THE STATE SHALL REGISTER THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY WITH THE DIVISION AND RENEW THE REGISTRATION EACH
SUBSEQUENT YEAR.
(C) THE SECRETARY MAY ESTABLISH BY REGULATION:
(1) A COMPLAINT FILING FEE, NOT EXCEEDING $100;
(2) AN ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE THAT IS BASED ON THE NUMBER
OF UNITS OR LOTS IN THE COMMUNITY;
(3) AN INITIAL GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT FILING FEE, NOT
EXCEEDING $100;
(4) A FEE FOR AN AMENDMENT TO A GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT
PREVIOUSLY FILED, NOT EXCEEDING $25; AND
(5) A FINE FOR A FAILURE TO FILE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS AS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, NOT EXCEEDING $500.
(D) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $50,004 TO THE DEPARTMENT TO BE
USED FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE DATABASE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
11C–204.
(A) (1) THE DIVISION MAY HEAR ANY COMPLAINT FILED UNDER §
11C–202 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A PARTY MAY NOT FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE DIVISION UNTIL:
(I) THE PARTY HAS MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO EXHAUST
ALL PROCEDURES AND REMEDIES PROVIDED BY THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF
THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(II) AT LEAST 60 DAYS AFTER ANY PROCEDURE OR REMEDY HAS
BEEN INITIATED WITH THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(3) (I) IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY DETERMINES THAT A DISPUTE EXISTS, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE

HOUSE BILL 402
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL NOTIFY THE OTHER PARTIES OF THE
OPTION TO FILE THE DISPUTE WITH THE DIVISION.
(II) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MAY NOT TAKE ACTION TO ENFORCE OR IMPLEMENT THE DECISION OF
THE GOVERNING BODY FOR 14 DAYS FOLLOWING NOTIFICATION OF ALL OTHER
PARTIES.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ON
THE FILING OF A COMPLAINT WITH THE DIVISION, THE DECISION OF THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL BE STAYED AND
MAY NOT BE ENFORCED OR IMPLEMENTED, OTHER THAN BY FILING A CIVIL ACTION,
UNTIL THE COMPLETION OF THE COMPLAINT PROCESS.
(B) (1) AT ANY TIME AFTER A COMPLAINT IS FILED, THE GOVERNING
BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO LIFT AN
AUTOMATIC STAY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A HEARING PANEL HAS NOT BEEN APPOINTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION SHALL AUTHORIZE A SPECIAL
STANDING PANEL TO CONSIDER REQUESTS FOR RELIEF FROM STAYS.
(3) THE SPECIAL PANEL SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER WHO IS AN OWNER IN A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(II) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS PROFESSIONS
ASSOCIATED WITH COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS
INVOLVED IN HOUSING DEVELOPMENT OR REAL ESTATE SALES, DEVELOPERS, OR
ATTORNEYS WHO REPRESENT COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES, OR IS A
LICENSED COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(4) (I) A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY THAT REQUESTS RELIEF FROM A STAY SHALL SERVE A COPY OF ITS
REQUEST ON ANY PARTY NAMED IN THE COMPLAINT BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR
PERSONAL SERVICE.
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE SHALL ACCOMPANY ANY
REQUEST SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(III) A PARTY SERVED WITH A COPY OF THE REQUEST SHALL
FILE ANY OPPOSITION TO THE REQUEST WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING
SERVICE.

HOUSE BILL 402 25
(5) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A REQUEST FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY MAY BE GRANTED ONLY IF THE
ASSIGNED PANEL FINDS THAT:
1. ENFORCING THE STAY WOULD RESULT IN UNDUE
HARM TO THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
2. LIFTING THE STAY WILL NOT RESULT IN UNDUE HARM
TO THE RIGHTS OR INTERESTS OF ANY OPPOSING PARTY.
(II) IF A REQUEST FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY STATING FACTS
SUFFICIENT TO SHOW A NEED FOR IMMEDIATE ACTION IS NOT GRANTED OR DENIED
WITHIN 20 DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST WAS FILED, THE REQUEST SHALL BE DEEMED
GRANTED.
(C) (1) FOLLOWING THE FILING OF A COMPLAINT, THE DIVISION SHALL
INVESTIGATE FACTS AND ASSEMBLE DOCUMENTS RELEVANT TO THE COMPLAINT.
(2) THE DIVISION MAY NOTIFY A PARTY IF THE DESIGNATED AGENCY
OR OFFICE FINDS THAT A COMPLAINT WAS NOT PROPERLY FILED.
(3) THE DIVISION MAY NOTIFY EACH PARTY OF THE COMPLAINT
REGARDING POSSIBLE SANCTIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) AFTER AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SECTION THE DIVISION
MAY:
(I) IF IT FINDS THAT THERE ARE NO REASONABLE GROUNDS TO
CONCLUDE THAT A VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW OR ANY GOVERNING DOCUMENT
HAS OCCURRED, DISMISS THE COMPLAINT;
(II) REQUEST ADDITIONAL INVESTIGATION; OR
(III) SCHEDULE A HEARING ON THE COMPLAINT.
(5) THE DIVISION MAY RECONSIDER THE DISMISSAL OF A
COMPLAINT IF ANY PARTY FILES A MOTION TO RECONSIDER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
THE COMPLAINT IS DISMISSED, DEMONSTRATING THAT:
(I) THE DIVISION ERRONEOUSLY INTERPRETED OR APPLIED
APPLICABLE LAW OR A GOVERNING DOCUMENT; OR

HOUSE BILL 402
(II) MATERIAL ISSUES OF FACT THAT ARE NECESSARY TO A FAIR
RESOLUTION OF THE COMPLAINT REMAIN UNRESOLVED.
(D) (1) ANY PARTY IN A COMPLAINT MAY REQUEST MEDIATION.
(2) IF A PARTY REQUESTS MEDIATION, THE DIVISION SHALL NOTIFY
ALL PARTIES OF THE REQUEST AND OF THE MEDIATION SESSION.
(3) THE DIVISION SHALL PROVIDE A QUALIFIED MEDIATOR TO MEET
WITH THE PARTIES WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A PARTY REQUESTS MEDIATION TO
ATTEMPT TO SETTLE THE COMPLAINT.
(4) IF A PARTY REFUSES TO ATTEND A MEDIATION SESSION, OR IF
MEDIATION DOES NOT SUCCESSFULLY RESOLVE THE COMPLAINT WITHIN 10 DAYS
AFTER THE FIRST MEDIATION SESSION IS HELD, THE DIVISION SHALL PROMPTLY
SCHEDULE A HEARING.
(E) (1) (I) IF A HEARING IS SCHEDULED, THE SECRETARY SHALL
CONVENE A PANEL TO HEAR THE COMPLAINT.
(II) THE SECRETARY SHALL SELECT AT LEAST ONE MEMBER
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(3)(I) OF THIS SECTION AND AT LEAST ONE
MEMBER DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(3)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) THE MEMBERS SELECTED BY THE SECRETARY SHALL
DESIGNATE A THIRD MEMBER OF THE PANEL FROM A LIST OF VOLUNTEER
ARBITRATORS TRAINED OR EXPERIENCED IN COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
ISSUES MAINTAINED BY THE DIVISION.
(2) A PANELIST MAY NOT HAVE AN INTEREST IN THE COMPLAINT TO
BE HEARD.
(3) A HEARING PANEL SHALL HOLD A HEARING ON EACH COMPLAINT
THAT IS NOT RESOLVED THROUGH MEDIATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION UNLESS THE DIVISION DETERMINES THAT THE COMPLAINT IS:
(I) IDENTICAL TO ANOTHER COMPLAINT BETWEEN THE SAME
PARTIES ON WHICH A HEARING HAS ALREADY BEEN HELD UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(II) CLEARLY NOT WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE
DIVISION.
(4) THE DIVISION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF A HEARING TO ALL
PARTIES NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS BEFORE THE HEARING, UNLESS THE DIVISION

HOUSE BILL 402 27
DETERMINES THAT AN EXPEDITED HEARING IS NECESSARY, IN WHICH CASE NOTICE
SHALL BE PROVIDED TO ALL PARTIES AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE THE HEARING.
(5) A PARTY OR WITNESS MAY BE ADVISED BY COUNSEL AT A
HEARING.
(6) IF A PARTY, AFTER PROPER NOTICE, DOES NOT APPEAR AT A
SCHEDULED HEARING, THE HEARING PANEL MAY ORDER ANY RELIEF FOR ANOTHER
PARTY THAT THE FACTS ON RECORD WARRANT.
(7) (I) THE HEARING PANEL SHALL APPLY STATE AND COUNTY
LAWS AND ALL RELEVANT CASE LAW TO THE FACTS OF THE COMPLAINT.
(II) A DECISION OF THE HEARING PANEL IS BINDING ON THE
PARTIES.
(8) (I) THE DIVISION MAY ENFORCE A DECISION OF THE HEARING
PANEL BY APPROPRIATE LEGAL ACTION.
(II) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ENFORCEMENT ACTION, THE
DIVISION MAY:
1. FILE FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO ENFORCE OR
CORRECT ANY VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. FILE TO RECOVER DAMAGES FOR A LOSS SUSTAINED
AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(9) A HEARING PANEL MAY AWARD COSTS, INCLUDING REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES, TO ANY PARTY IF ANY OTHER PARTY:
(I) FILED OR MAINTAINED A FRIVOLOUS COMPLAINT, OR FILED
OR MAINTAINED A COMPLAINT IN BAD FAITH;
(II) REFUSED TO PARTICIPATE IN MEDIATION OF A COMPLAINT;
OR
(III) SUBSTANTIALLY DELAYED OR HINDERED THE COMPLAINT
RESOLUTION PROCESS WITHOUT GOOD CAUSE.
(10) A HEARING PANEL MAY REQUIRE A LOSING PARTY IN A
COMPLAINT TO PAY ALL OR PART OF ANY FILING FEE.
(11) THE DIVISION MAY:

HOUSE BILL 402
(I) ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL HEARING PROCEDURES; AND
(II) ADOPT ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO
WITNESSES AND EVIDENCE FOR A HEARING.
(F) (1) A PARTY MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF A HEARING PANEL TO A
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(2) AN APPEAL OF A DECISION SHALL BE CONSOLIDATED WITH ANY
CASE THAT ARISES OUT OF THE SAME FACTS.
(3) THE COURT HEARING AN APPEAL SHALL SUSTAIN THE DECISION
OF THE HEARING PANEL UNLESS THE DECISION IS:
(I) INCONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE LAW;
(II) LACKING SUBSTANTIAL EVIDENCE; OR
(III) ARBITRARY AND CAPRICIOUS.
(G) (1) A PARTY MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION ARISING OUT OF A GOVERNING
DOCUMENT OR A LAW REGULATING THE POWERS OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(2) IF THE COURT IS NOTIFIED THAT A COMPLAINT HAS BEEN FILED
WITH THE DIVISION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT MAY
POSTPONE A PROCEEDING FOR AT LEAST 90 DAYS.
(3) THE COURT MAY HEAR THE ACTION DE NOVO IF A HEARING PANEL
ASSIGNED TO THE COMPLAINT HAS NOT ISSUED A DECISION UNDER SUBSECTION (E)
OF THIS SECTION.
11C–205.
(A) (1) THE CREATION OF THE DIVISION DOES NOT OVERRIDE, PREEMPT,
OR DIMINISH THE AUTHORITY OF ANY EXISTING COMMISSION ON COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY OR LOCAL MUNICIPALITY.
(2) A COUNTY OR LOCAL MUNICIPALITY MAY ESTABLISH, MAINTAIN,
OR EXPAND ITS OWN COMMISSION OR OVERSIGHT BODY CONSISTENT WITH LOCAL
LAW AND SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 402 29
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A LOCAL
JURISDICTION FROM ADOPTING SUPPLEMENTAL GOVERNANCE STRUCTURES OR
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROGRAMS FOR COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
11C–206.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY OVERSIGHT FUND.
(B) THERE IS A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OVERSIGHT FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING TO THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OVERSIGHT DIVISION IN THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) THE FOLLOWING FEES COLLECTED UNDER § 11C–203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE:
(I) COMPLAINT FILING FEES;
(II) ANNUAL COMMON OWNERSHIP REGISTRATION FEES; AND
(III) GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT FILING FEES;
(2) FINES ASSESSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.

HOUSE BILL 402
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OVERSIGHT
FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.